Louisiana, session 2026, HB510.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:1104(C)(introductory paragraph) is hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 30:1104(C)(4) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1104. Duties and powers of the secretary; rules and regulations; permits
* * *
C. Prior to the use of any reservoir for the storage of carbon dioxide and
prior to the exercise of eminent domain pursuant to the provisions of R.S. 19:2(11)
and R.S. 30:1108 by any person, firm, or corporation having such right under laws
of the state of Louisiana, and as a condition precedent to such use or to the exercise
of such rights of eminent domain pursuant to the provisions of R.S. 19:2(11) and
R.S. 30:1108, the secretary, after public hearing pursuant to the provisions of R.S.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-121 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 510
30:6, held in the parish where the storage facility is to be located, shall have found
at least one all of the following:
* * *
(4) The carbon dioxide to be stored was generated within the state of
Louisiana.
* * *